apertium-pol.pol.dix
<pardef n="BASE__trzeci">
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ia</l>        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iego</l>      <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iego</l>      <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iego</l>      <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iej</l>       <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iego</l>      <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ich</l>       <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ich</l>       <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ich</l>       <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ich</l>       <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ich</l>       <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ich</l>       <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iemu</l>      <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iemu</l>      <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iemu</l>      <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iej</l>       <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iemu</l>      <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>im</l>        <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iego</l>      <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iego</l>      <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ią</l>        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ich</l>       <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ią</l>        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>imi</l>       <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>imi</l>       <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>imi</l>       <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>imi</l>       <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>imi</l>       <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>imi</l>       <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iej</l>       <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ich</l>       <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ich</l>       <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ich</l>       <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ich</l>       <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ich</l>       <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ich</l>       <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ia</l>        <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ie</l>        <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="trzec/i__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="ord"/></r></p><par n="BASE__trzeci"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="c/o__det">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zego</l>      <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zemu</l>      <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zym</l>       <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zym</l>       <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="głup/i__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>i<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__trzeci"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>io</l>        <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="co">              <i>c</i><par n="c/o__det"/></e>
<e lm="trzeci">          <i>trzec</i><par n="trzec/i__det"/></e>
<e>                      <re>[0-9]+</re><i>-c</i><par n="trzec/i__det"/></e>
<e>                      <re>[0-9]+</re><i>c</i><par n="trzec/i__det"/></e>
<e lm="dostatni">        <i>dostatn</i><par n="głup/i__adj"/></e>
<e lm="głupi">           <i>głup</i><par n="głup/i__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tani">            <i>tan</i><par n="głup/i__adj"/></e>
